Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 8 Appointment and Qualification of Executors and Administrators

33-8-1.
Grant of letters to executor named in will.

Upon the probate of a will the probate court shall issue letters testamentary thereon to the executor named therein, if he or she is legally competent, and if he or she gives bond as by law required.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 815; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-1

.

33-8-2.
Minority of named executor.

If a person named as executor in a will is at the time of the probate thereof under the age of eighteen (18) years, the other executor or executors, if any qualify, shall administer the estate until the minor arrives at full age, when, upon qualifying, he or she may be admitted as a joint executor of the will. If no other executor shall qualify, administration may be granted with the will annexed during the minority of the person named as executor and until he or she shall qualify.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 817; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-2

; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 6.

33-8-3.
Neglect to present will for probate.

If a person named as executor in a will and having possession thereof neglects or refuses to present the will for probate within thirty (30) days after the decease of the testator, or within thirty (30) days after he or she has knowledge that he or she is so named, that neglect or refusal shall be deemed a declination of the office by the executor.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 818; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-3

.

33-8-4.
Grant of letters or administration on incompetence or failure of named executor to qualify.

If a person named as executor in a will has deceased, or is incompetent, or refuses to accept the trust, or neglects to qualify for thirty (30) days after the probate of a will, or within thirty (30) days after notice of probate, as provided in §

33-7-9

, the court shall grant letters testamentary to the other executors, if any are named in the will, who are competent and qualify; otherwise the court upon petition therefor shall grant administration on the estate with the will annexed to some suitable person.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 819; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-4

.

33-8-5.
Powers of surviving and qualifying joint executors — Filling of vacancies.

If a testator shall appoint more than one executor of his or her will, and any of them die or do not qualify, or, having qualified, shall die, resign, or be removed, or become incapable of acting, those who for the time being are qualified to act shall, unless otherwise provided in the will, have the same power and authority as is given by the will to the executors named therein; provided, that, upon the petition of any party in interest, the probate court may appoint an administrator with the will annexed to fill the vacancy, in which case the probate court shall also grant letters of administration to the administrator with the will annexed if he or she shall qualify and the administrator with the will annexed shall have the same power and authority as is given by the will to the executor in whose place he or she is appointed, unless the will contains an express provision contrary thereto.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 820; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 4; P.L. 1945, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-5

.

33-8-6.
Executor of executor.

The executor of an executor shall not, as such, administer the estate of the first testator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 821; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-6

.

33-8-7.
Residence of administrator.

No person not an inhabitant of this state shall be appointed administrator by reason of any right to the trust, unless other circumstances, in the opinion of the court, render the appointment proper.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 825; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-7

.

33-8-8.
Administration of intestate estate.

Administration of the estate of a person dying intestate shall be granted as follows:

To the widow or surviving husband or one or more of the next of kin, or to the widow or surviving husband jointly with one or more of the next of kin, they being suitable persons and competent.

If the widow or surviving husband and the next of kin shall neglect to apply for letters of administration within thirty (30) days after the decease of a person intestate, or shall be unsuitable for the discharge of the trust, or renounce the administration, the probate court may, on petition therefor of some party in interest, grant administration to any suitable person.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 824; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 10; P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-8

.

33-8-9.
Administration of partially intestate estate.

If a will which disposes of only a part of the estate of a testator is admitted to probate, the executor of the will, or the administrator with the will annexed, shall, unless otherwise provided in the will, and except as provided in the second clause of §

33-8-8

, be ex officio the administrator of the intestate estate, and shall give bond to cover all his or her duties.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 823; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-9

.

33-8-10.
Administration de bonis non.

If a sole or a surviving executor or administrator dies, resigns, or is removed before having fully administered an estate, or there is any thing remaining to be done in execution of the will, the probate court shall grant letters of administration with the will annexed, or of administration, as the case may require, to administer the estate of the deceased not already administered.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 826; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-10

.

33-8-11.
Marriage of executrix or administratrix.

If an unmarried woman shall be appointed an executor or administrator and thereafter shall marry, the marriage shall not make her husband an executor or administrator in her right nor disqualify her as executor or administrator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 822; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-8-11

.